Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1508
Support; allocation of costs; basis.

The department may allocate costs for programs and services between the department and the family or the disabled person in an independent living situation. Such cost allocation shall be based on the need for support pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 and shall not be based on income guidelines or fee schedules established for other programs administered by the department.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 8.